Utah statutes.
53A-2-108.   School districts independent of municipal and county
governments -- School district name -- Control of property.
(1) (a)  Each school district shall be controlled by its board of education
and shall be independent of municipal and county governments.
(b)  The name of each school district created after May 1, 2000 shall comply
with Subsection 17-50-103(2)(a).
(2)  The local school board shall have direction and control of all school
property in the district.
